Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202548-1122
Contracts with state and political subdivisions; requirements.

Every contract to which the state or any of its political subdivisions is a party shall contain a provision requiring the contractor and his or her subcontractors not to discriminate against any employee or applicant for employment, to be employed in the performance of such contract, with respect to his or her hire, tenure, terms, conditions, or privileges of employment, because of his or her race, color, religion, sex, disability, national origin, or military or veteran status.

Laws 1965, c. 276, § 22, p. 797;

Laws 1973, LB 266, § 13;

Laws 2025, LB150, § 89.